Utah statutes.
72-6-114.   Restricting use of or closing highway -- Penalty for failure to observe barricade, warning light, etc.

(1)  A highway authority may close or restrict travel on a highway under their jurisdiction due to construction, maintenance work, or emergency.

(2)  If a highway or portion of a highway is closed or restricted to travel, a highway authority shall cause suitable barriers and notices to be posted and maintained in accordance with Section 41-6a-301.

(3)  A person who willfully fails to observe any temporary or permanent barricade, warning light, sign, cone, or other object used in accordance with this section, or to obey a flagman, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

